test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-2-nitonawîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-kî-nitonawitwâw, î-kî-nitonawicik] # as they sought me, as they looked for me, as they searched for me
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nitonâskwâw # as they sought you, as they looked for you, as they searched for you
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyâhkwâw # as they sought us, as they looked for us, as they searched for us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nitonawiyamihcik # as they sought us, as they looked for us, as they searched for us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyahkwâw # as they sought you and us, as they looked for you and us, as they searched for you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nitonâtahkwâw # as they sought you and us, as they looked for you and us, as they searched for you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyîkwâw # as they sought you all, as they looked for you all, as they searched for you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nitonâtîkwâw # as they sought you all, as they looked for you all, as they searched for you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonawâcik # as they sought another/others, as they looked for another/others, as they searched for another/others
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonâmâcik # as they sought yet another/others, as they looked for yet another/others, as they searched for yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-nitonâmit # as another/others sought me, as another/others looked for me, as another/others searched for me
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nitonâmisk # as another/others sought you, as another/others looked for you, as another/others searched for you
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nitonâkot # as another/others sought him/her, as another/others looked for him/her, as another/others searched for him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyâhk # as another/others sought us, as another/others looked for us, as another/others searched for us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyahk # as another/others sought you and us, as another/others looked for you and us, as another/others searched for you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyîk # as another/others sought you all, as another/others looked for you all, as another/others searched for you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nitonâkocik # as another/others sought them, as another/others looked for them, as another/others searched for them
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonawâthit # as another/others sought yet another/others, as another/others looked for yet another/others, as another/others searched for yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonâkothit # as yet another/others sought another/others, as yet another/others looked for another/others, as yet another/others searched for another/others

      # X
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-nitonâkawiyân # as someone sought me, as someone looked for me, as someone searched for me
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-nitonâkawiyan # as someone sought you, as someone looked for you, as someone searched for you
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-nitonâht # as someone sought him/her, as someone looked for him/her, as someone searched for him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-nitonâkawiyâhk # as someone sought us, as someone looked for us, as someone searched for us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-nitonâkawiyahk # as someone sought you and us, as someone looked for you and us, as someone searched for you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-nitonâkawiyîk # as someone sought you all, as someone looked for you all, as someone searched for you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-nitonâhcik # as someone sought them, as someone looked for them, as someone searched for them
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonâmiht # as someone sought another/others, as someone looked for another/others, as someone searched for another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-nitonâkoyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nitonâkoyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nitonâkot
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nitonâkoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nitonâkocik
      PV/î+PV/ki+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nitonâkothit
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-nitonâtin # I am going to seek you, I am going to look for you, I am going to search for you
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-nitonawâw # I am going to seek him/her, I am going to look for him/her, I am going to search for him/her
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-nitonâtinâwâw # I am going to seek you all, I am going to look for you all, I am going to search for you all
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-nitonawâwak # I am going to seek them, I am going to look for them, I am going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-nitonâmâwa # I am going to seek another/others, I am going to look for another/others, I am going to search for another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-nitonawin # you are going to seek me, you are going to look for me, you are going to search for me
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-nitonawâw # you are going to seek him/her, you are going to look for him/her, you are going to search for him/her
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-nitonawinân # you are going to seek us, you are going to look for us, you are going to search for us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-nitonawâwak # you are going to seek them, you are going to look for them, you are going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nitonâmâwa # you are going to seek another/others, you are going to look for another/others, you are going to search for another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-nitonawin # you are going to seek me, you are going to look for me, you are going to search for me
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-nitonâk # he/she is going to seek you, he/she is going to look for you, he/she is going to search for you
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-nitonawinân # you are going to seek us, you are going to look for us, you are going to search for us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-nitonâkonaw # he/she is going to seek you and us, he/she is going to look for you and us, he/she is going to search for you and us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-nitonâkowâw # he/she is going to seek you all, he/she is going to look for you all, he/she is going to search for you all
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-nitonawâwak # you are going to seek them, you are going to look for them, you are going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nitonâmâwa # you are going to seek another/others, you are going to look for another/others, you are going to search for another/others
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-nitonâmîw # he/she is going to seek yet another/others, he/she is going to look for yet another/others, he/she is going to search for yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwî-nitonâtinân # we are going to seek you, we are going to look for you, we are going to search for you
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwî-nitonawânân # we are going to seek him/her, we are going to look for him/her, we are going to search for him/her
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwî-nitonâtinân # we are going to seek you all, we are going to look for you all, we are going to search for you all
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwî-nitonawânânak # we are going to seek them, we are going to look for them, we are going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwî-nitonâmânâna # we are going to seek another/others, we are going to look for another/others, we are going to search for another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwî-nitonawânaw # we and you are going to seek him/her, we and you are going to look for him/her, we and you are going to search for him/her
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwî-nitonawânawak # we and you are going to seek them, we and you are going to look for them, we and you are going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nitonâmânawa # we and you are going to seek another/others, we and you are going to look for another/others, we and you are going to search for another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kiwî-nitonawinâwâw # you all are going to seek me, you all are going to look for me, you all are going to search for me
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kiwî-nitonawâwâw # you all are going to seek him/her, you all are going to look for him/her, you all are going to search for him/her
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kiwî-nitonawinân # you all are going to seek us, you all are going to look for us, you all are going to search for us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kiwî-nitonawâwâwak # you all are going to seek them, you all are going to look for them, you all are going to search for them
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nitonâmâwâwa # you all are going to seek another/others, you all are going to look for another/others, you all are going to search for another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: niwî-nitonâkwak # they are going to seek me, they are going to look for me, they are going to search for me
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kiwî-nitonâkwak # they are going to seek you, they are going to look for you, they are going to search for you
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: niwî-nitonâkonânak # they are going to seek us, they are going to look for us, they are going to search for us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kiwî-nitonâkonawak # they are going to seek you and us, they are going to look for you and us, they are going to search for you and us
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kiwî-nitonâkowâwak # they are going to seek you all, they are going to look for you all, they are going to search for you all
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-nitonawîwak # they are going to seek another/others, they are going to look for another/others, they are going to search for another/others
      PV/wi+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wî-nitonâmîwak # they are going to seek yet another/others, they are going to look for yet another/others, they are going to search for yet another/others
